District of Columbia statutes.
48-931.01

Physician privilege.

Information communicated to a physician in an effort unlawfully to procure controlled substances, or unlawfully to procure the administration of any such controlled substances, shall not be deemed a privileged communication.

History

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 795, ch. 532, § 20
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 604(b)(4), 28 DCR 3081

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-566.
1973 Ed., § 33-420.

Editor's Notes

Subsection (b) of former § 33-521 was redesignated to be § 33-566 1981 Ed. upon the enactment of D.C. Law 4-29.